North Dakota, session 69, SB2173.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATIVE ASSEMBLY OF NORTH DAKOTA:
SECTION 1. AMENDMENT. Subsection 10 of section 50-25.1-02 of the North Dakota Century
Code is amended and reenacted as follows:
10. "Children's advocacy center" means a fullan accredited or associate member of the national
children's alliance which assists in the coordination of the investigation in response to
allegations of child abuse by providing a dedicated child-friendly location at which to conduct
forensic interviews, forensic medical examinations, and other appropriate services and which
promotes a comprehensive multidisciplinary team response to allegations of child abuse. The
team response may include forensic interviews, forensic medical examinations, mental health
and related support services, advocacy, and case review.
SECTION 2. AMENDMENT. Section 50-25.1-11.1 of the North Dakota Century Code is amended
and reenacted as follows:
50-25.1-11.1. Children's advocacy centers - Confidentiality of records - Criminal history
record checks.
1. Records and digital media in the possession of a children's advocacy center relating to a
forensic medical examination, forensic interview, advocacy, or therapy are confidential and
only may be released only to a person other than a law enforcement agency, the department
or the department's authorized agent, a prosecutor, a court, another children's advocacy
center, or a medical or mental health professional when the child comes before the medical or
mental health professional in that person's professional capacity, upon service of a subpoena
signed by a judge.
2. The staff of a children's advocacy center may communicate with a law enforcement agency,
the department or the department's authorized agent, a prosecutor, a court, another children's
advocacy center, or a medical or mental health professional in that individual's official capacity,
for the purpose of discussing a forensic medical examination, forensic interview, advocacy, or
therapy.
3. The department may submit a request for a criminal history record check under section
12-60-24 on a board member, an employee, a final applicant for employment of a children's
advocacy center, a contractor, or a volunteer of a children's advocacy center who has contact
with a child at or through a children's advocacy center.
3.4. As used in this section, "board member" means an individual serving on the board of a
children's advocacy center.

S. B. NO. 2173 - PAGE 2
____________________________ ____________________________
President of the Senate Speaker of the House
____________________________ ____________________________
Secretary of the Senate Chief Clerk of the House
This certifies that the within bill originated in the Senate of the Sixty-ninth Legislative Assembly of North
Dakota and is known on the records of that body as Senate Bill No. 2173.
Senate Vote: Yeas 46 Nays 0 Absent 1
House Vote: Yeas 89 Nays 0 Absent 5
____________________________
Secretary of the Senate
Received by the Governor at ________M. on _____________________________________, 2025.
Approved at ________M. on __________________________________________________, 2025.
____________________________
Governor
Filed in this office this ___________day of _______________________________________, 2025,
at ________ o’clock ________M.
____________________________
Secretary of State